Missouri, session 2026, HB3134.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 590, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 590.045, to read as follows:
590.045. 1. There is hereby established within the department of public safety
the "Missouri Green-to-Blue Bridge Program". Under the program, reserve or active
duty members of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard who
have earned a diploma from the United States Army Military Police School (USAMPS)
with a Military Occupational Specialty (MOS) 31A or 31B, and who have successfully
completed One Station Unit Training (OSUT), shall receive Missouri Peace Officer
Standards and Training (POST) credit under the provisions of this section.
2. The POST commission is hereby authorized to establish the Missouri green-to-
blue bridge program of instruction consisting of certain peace officer training courses
for persons qualified to receive credit under subsection 1 of this section. The instruction
program shall provide sufficient hour and point requirements to qualify such persons to
sit for the Missouri peace officer standards and training examination. The program
may also seek to fulfill Department of Defense requirements and reciprocity conditions
involving the transfer of civilian training to military applications.
3. A valid diploma from USAMPS issued within three years shall exempt persons
who qualify under subsection 1 from the maximum amount of redundant training
requirements for general law enforcement and related tasks. Such tasks shall be
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3134 2
considered mastered during successful completion of the published USAMPS
curriculum standards. If the person directly serves on active duty after earning their
diploma from USAMPS, the three-year period shall start from the date of their first
honorable discharge after the diploma is issued, as long as the person remained serving
in the MOS 31A or 31B.
4. The POST commission shall regularly consult the Missouri Army National
Guard provost marshal to review and ensure the Missouri green-to-blue curriculum
maximizes credit granted for training completed at USAMPS, with an emphasis on the
subjects of firearms, defensive tactics, medical training, criminal investigation, and
driver training.
5. The department of public safety may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔